Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.161

Cows, goats, and other mammals—Animal health requirements.

(1) All milking cows, goats, and other mammals must meet the animal health requirements established by the state veterinarian under the authority of chapter 16.36 RCW.

(2) Milk or milk products from cows, goats, and other mammals intended for consumption in the raw state must be from a herd which is tested negative within the previous twelve months for brucellosis, tuberculosis, and any other disease the director may designate by rule. Additions to the herd must be tested negative for the diseases within the previous thirty days before introduction into the herd. The state veterinarian shall direct all testing procedures in accordance with state and national standards for animal disease eradication.

(3) Cows, goats, and other mammals showing chronic mastitis, whether producing abnormal milk or not, shall be permanently excluded from the milking herd. Cows, goats, and other mammals producing bloody, stringy, or otherwise abnormal milk, but with only slight inflammation of the udder shall be excluded from the herd until reexamination shows that the milk has become normal.

[ 1999 c 291 s 8; 1982 c 131 s 2; 1961 c 11 s 15.36.150. Prior: 1955 c 238 s 15; prior: 1949 c 168 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6266-36, part. Formerly RCW 15.36.150.]